en: lemon cells
de: Zitronenzellen
fr: cellules de citron
hr: stanice limuna
it: cellule di limone

en: lemon fibre
de: Zitronenfaser
es: fibras de limón
fi: sitruunakuitu
fr: fibre de citron, fibres de citron
hr: vlakna limuna
it: fibra di limone, fibre di limone
nl: citroenvezels
ru: цитрусовые волокна
sv: citronfiber

en: preserved lemon
fr: citron confit, citrons confits
it: limone conservato

en: candied lemon zest
fr: zestes de citron confits, zeste de citron confit
it: scorza di limone candita

en: lemon oil
bg: лимоново масло
da: citronolie
de: Zitronenöl
es: Aceite de limón
fi: Sitruunaöljy
fr: essence de citron, huile essentielle de citron, huile de citron
hr: ulje limuna
hu: citromolaj
it: essenza di limone, olio essenziale di limone
lt: citrinų aliejus
nl: Citroenolie
pl: olejek cytrynowy
pt: Óleo de limão
sv: citronolja

en: lemon juice
bg: сок от лимон, лимонов сок
ca: Suc de llimona
cs: Citronová šťáva
da: citronsaft
de: Zitronensaft
el: χυμός λεμονιού
es: zumo de limón, jugo de limón
fi: sitruunamehu, sitruunatäysmehu
fr: jus de citron
hr: sok od limuna, soka limuna, limunov sok, limunovog soka
hu: Citromlé
it: succo di limone
ja: レモンジュース, レモン果汁
lv: citronu sula
nb: sitronjuice
nl: citroensap
nn: sitronsaft
pl: Sok cytrynowy, sok z cytryny
pt: suco de limão, sumo de limão
ru: Лимонный сок
sl: limonin sok
sv: citronsaft, citronjuice
tr: limon suyu
zh: 柠檬汁

en: pasteurized lemon juice
bg: пастьоризиран лимонов сок
da: pasteuriseret citronsaft
de: pasteurisierter Zitronensaft
fr: jus de citron pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirani sok od limuna
it: succo di limone pastorizzato

en: pure lemon juice
fr: pur jus de citron
it: succo di limone puro

en: organic lemon juice
de: Bio-Zitronensaft
es: zumo de limón orgánico, jugo de limón orgánico
fi: luomusitruunamehu, luomusitruunatäysmehu
fr: jus de citron bio, jus de citron issu de l'agriculture biologique, jus de citron biologique
hr: organski sok od limuna
it: succo di limone biologico
nl: biologisch citroensap
sv: ekologisk citronjuice

en: lemon powder, dried lemon juice
bg: лимонов прах
da: tørket citronsaft, citronsaftpulver
de: Zitronenpulver, Zitronensaftpulver, Zitronenfruchtpulver
es: zumo de limón seco, jugo de limón seco
fi: sitruunamehujauhe, kuivattu sitruunamehu, sitruunajauhe
fr: jus de citron en poudre, citron en poudre, poudre de citron, jus de citron déshydraté
hr: limun u prahu
it: limone in polvere
nl: gedroogd citroensap, citroensappoeder
nn: tørket sitronsaft, sitronjuivepulver
pt: suco de limão desidratado, sumo de limão desidratado
sv: torkad citronjuice, citronjuicepulver

en: lemon extract
bg: екстракт от лимон
de: Zitronenextrakt
es: extracto de limón
fi: sitruunauute
fr: concentré de citron, extrait de citron
it: estratto di limone, concentrato di limone
sv: citronextrakt

fr: extrait naturel de citron, extraits naturels de citron
en: natural lemon extract
it: estratto naturale di limone, estratto naturale di limoni

en: concentrated lemon juice, Lemon juice concentrate
bg: концентрат от лимонов сок, концентриран сок от лимони, концентриран лимонов сок
ca: Suc de llimona concentrat, Concentrat de suc de llimona
cs: koncentrovaná citrónová šťáva, koncentrovaná citronová šťáva, koncentrát citronové šťávy, koncentrát citrónové šťávy
da: citronsaftkonsentrat, citronjuicekoncentrat
de: Zitronensaftkonzentrat, Zitronenkonzentrat
es: zumo concentrado de limón, jugo concentrado de limón, zumo de limón concentrado, jugo de limón concentrado, concentrado de zumo de limón, concentrado de jugo de limón
et: sidrunimahla kontsentraat
fi: sitruunamehutiiviste, sitruunatäysmehutiiviste, sitruunatiiviste
fr: jus concentré de citron, jus de citron concentré, jus de citrons concentré, concentré de jus de citron, jus concentré pulpé de citron
hr: koncentrirani limunov sok, koncentrat soka od limuna, koncentrirani sok limuna, ugušćeni sok limuna
hu: Citromlé koncentrátum, citromlé sűrítmény, sűrített citromlé
it: succo di limone concentrato
lt: citrinų sulčių koncentratas
lv: koncentrēta citronu sula
nb: sitronjuicekonsentrat
nl: citroenextract, geconcentreerd citroensap, citroensapconcentraat, citroenconcentraat
pl: Zagęszczony sok cytrynowy, koncentrat soku z cytryny, koncentrat soku cytrynowego, zagęszczonego soku cytrynowego
pt: Concentrado de suco de limão, concentrado de sumo de limão
ru: Концентрированный лимонный сок
sv: citronkoncentrat, citronsaftkoncentrat, citronjuicekoncentrat
tr: limon suyu konsantresi

en: lemon juice from concentrate
bg: лимонов сок от концентрат, сок от лимон от концентрат
cs: Citronová šťáva z koncetrátu
da: Citronsaftkoncentrat
de: Zitronensaft aus Zitronensaftkonzentrat, Zitronensaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentrat
es: zumo de limón a partir de concentrado, jugo de limón a partir de concentrado, zumo de limón procedente de concentrado, jugo de limón procedente de concentrado
fi: sitruunamehu tiivisteestä, sitruunatäysmehu tiivisteestä, tiivisteestä valmistettu sitruunatäysmehu
fr: jus de citron à base de concentré, jus de citron reconstitué, jus de citron à partir de concentré, jus de citron à base de jus concentré, jus de citron reconstitué à base de concentré
hr: limuna od koncentriranog soka
hu: citromlé koncentrátumból
it: succo di limone da concentrato
nl: citroensap uit concentraat, citroensap uit geconcentreerd sap
pl: sok cytrynowy z koncentratu, sok cytrynowy z zagęszczonego soku cytrynowego, sok z cytryn z zagęszczonego soku z cytryn
sv: citronjuice från koncentrat, citronsaft från koncentrat

en: concentrated lemon extract
fi: tiivistetty sitruunauute
fr: Extrait de citron concentré
hr: koncentrirani ekstrakt limuna
it: estratto concentrato di limone

en: lemon preparation
hr: pripravak od limuna
it: preparazione al limone

en: lemon cake honey preparation
hr: pripravak limun kolač med
it: preparazione miele torta al limone

en: lemon filling
hr: punjenje s okusom limuna
it: ripieno al limone

en: Eureka lemon
da: eureka-citron
sv: eureka-citron, citroner (eureka)

en: Verna lemon, lemon Verna
da: verna-citron
sv: verna-citron, citroner verna